src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_HYPPIÄ
!! € hyppiä
0:pi      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:p       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_MOITTIA
!! € moittia
0:ti      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:t       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ti        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_MIETTIÄ
!! € miettiä
0:ti      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:t       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ti        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:it       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_RIIPIÄ
!! € riipiä
0:pi      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:vi     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:p       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:v       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vi       V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vit       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:vit       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_RAAPIA
!! € raapia
0:pi      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:vi     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:p     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:v       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pi        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vi       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vit      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vit      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_AHNEHTIA
!! € ahnehtia
0:ti      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:di     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:t       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ti        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:di       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dit      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dit      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_EHTIÄ
!! € ehtiä
0:ti      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:di     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:t       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ti        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:di       V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dit       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:dit       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_MÖNKIÄ
!! € mönkiä
0:ki      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:gi     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:k       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:g       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gi       V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:git       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:git       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_ONKIA
!! € onkia
0:ki      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gi     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:k       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:g       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ki        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gi       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:git      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:git      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_TYMPIÄ
!! € tympiä
0:pi      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:mi     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pi      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:p       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:m       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:p       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:pi        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mi       V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mit       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:mit       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KONTIA
!! € kontia
0:ti      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ti      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ni     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ti      V_BACK_3SG_I ;
0:t       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:n       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ti        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ni       V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nit      V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:nit      V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_HYLKIÄ
!! € hylkiä
0:ki      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ji     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ki      V_FRONT_3SG_I ;
0:k       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:j       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ki        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ji       V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jit       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:jit       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KOPIOIDA
!! € kopioida
0:id    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:id    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:i   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i   V_BACK_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:i   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:i   V_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ
!! € kopioida
0:id    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:id    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_SAADA
!! € saada
0:ad    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ad    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:a   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:a   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:a   V_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_MYYDÄ
!! € myydä
0:yd    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:yd    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:y   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_Y          ;
0       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:y   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:y   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:y   V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_JÄÄDÄ
!! € jäädä
0:äd    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:äd    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_VIEDÄ
!! € viedä
0:ied   V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ied   V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ie    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:e       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:e   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:e   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ie  V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_TUODA
!! € tuoda
0:uod   V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:uod   V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:uo    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:uo  V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:u   V_BACK_3SG_O          ;
0:o       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:o   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:o   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:uo  V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:uo  V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:uo  V_BACK_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:uo  V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:uo  V_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_SYÖDÄ
!! € syödä
0:yöd   V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:yöd   V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:yö    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:y   V_FRONT_3SG_Ö          ;
0:ö       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:ö   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ö   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:yö  V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_KÄYDÄ
!! € käydä
0:yd   V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:yd   V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:y  V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_Y          ;
0:v       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:v  V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:v  V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:y  V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:y  V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:y  V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:y  V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_MARISTA
!! € marista
0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:e     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0       V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0   V_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;

LEXICON V_ÄRISTÄ
!! € marista
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0       V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0   V_FRONT_TUPCP_STRONG  ;


LEXICON V_HÄVÄISTÄ
!! € häväistä
0:väist    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:väist    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:päise     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:päise   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:päise   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:päis    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:päis   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:päis   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:väis   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:väis   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:väis   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:väis   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:väis   V_FRONT_TUPCP_STRONG  ;

LEXICON V_VAVISTA
!! € vavista
0:vist    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vist    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pise     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pise   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pise   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pis     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:pis   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pis   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:vis   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:vis   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:vis   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vis   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vis   V_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;

LEXICON V_RANGAISTA
!! € rangaista
0:gaist    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:gaist    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kaise     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kaise   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kaise   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:kais    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:kais   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kais   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:gais   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gais   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:gais   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:gais   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:gais   V_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;

LEXICON V_PIERRÄ
!! € pierrä
0:r    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:r    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_R ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_R    ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0   V_FRONT_TUPCP_R    ;

LEXICON V_MENNÄ
!! € mennä
0:l    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:l    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_N    ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0   V_FRONT_TUPCP_N    ;
